Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1312
Act, how cited.

Sections 79-1312 to 79-1322 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Educational Telecommunications Act.

Laws 1963, c. 468, § 6, p. 1500;

Laws 1984, LB 645, § 7;

Laws 1988, LB 939, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 89, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-2106;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 968;

Laws 2002, LB 93, § 20;

Laws 2014, LB692, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB254, § 6.